California, session 20252026, AB9.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66744.3 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 66744.2, to read:66744.3. Before September 1, 2026, the California State University shall do all of the following:(a) Establish specific goals for the adequate representation of community college transfer students in each discipline, program, or major at the system level, and where feasible, at each campus.(b) Establish a formal and documented method for identifying when individual campuses are below one or more goals established in subdivision (a).(c) Report on its internet website all of the following:(1) The ratio of the number of enrolled community college transfer students to the total number of enrolled undergraduate students enrolled systemwide.(2) The ratio of the number of enrolled community college transfer students to the total number of enrolled undergraduate students enrolled at each campus.(3) The ratio of the number of enrolled community college transfer students in each discipline, program, or major to the total number of undergraduates enrolled in each discipline, program, or major systemwide.SEC. 2. Section 66744.4 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 66744.3, to read:66744.4. Before September 1, 2026, the University of California is requested to do both of the following:(a) Establish a formal process for identifying the specific disciplines, programs, or majors where capacity increases for community college transfer students at individual campuses would be most valuable.(b) Prioritize the areas identified in subdivision (a) for future capacity increases.